Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Insurers Demutualization Act, the terms defined in section 44-103 shall have the same meanings as set forth in such section and:

(1) Final order shall mean the final written order of the director approving or disapproving the conversion of a mutual insurer to a stock insurer; and

(2) Policyholders shall mean the policyholders of the mutual insurer on the day the plan of conversion is initially approved by the board of directors of the mutual insurer.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 43.